sc_IT/sc_IT/sc_IT.dic
abbefare/g po:verbu
abbotzare/g po:verbu
abbutonare/g po:verbu
abrancare/g po:verbu
acabussare/g po:verbu
acartzonare/g po:verbu
acollare/g po:verbu
acotzare/g po:verbu
acumonare/g po:verbu
addescare/g po:verbu
addurare/g po:verbu
aescare/g po:verbu
afeare/g po:verbu
afiantzare/g po:verbu
afissare/g po:verbu
afrancare/g po:verbu
agafare/g po:verbu
agiogatzare/g po:verbu
agravare/g po:verbu
airare/g po:verbu
alienare/g po:verbu
alleare/g po:verbu
alliare/g po:verbu
allogare/g po:verbu
allupare/g po:verbu
ambientare/g po:verbu
ammandronare/g po:verbu
ammentare/g po:verbu
ammirare/g po:verbu
ammuntare/g po:verbu
ammutzigonare/g po:verbu
andare/g po:verbu
annigrare/g po:verbu
antzianare/g po:verbu
aparisare/g po:verbu
apedrigare/g po:verbu
apicare/g po:verbu
apotentare/g po:verbu
aprofitare/g po:verbu
arganare/g po:verbu
arraighinare/g po:verbu
arremangare/g po:verbu
arribare/g po:verbu
arropare/g po:verbu
arrumbare/g po:verbu
ascurtare/g po:verbu
assangrare/g po:verbu
assenegare/g po:verbu
assimilare/g po:verbu
assumare/g po:verbu
atacare/g po:verbu
atenuare/g po:verbu
atogare/g po:verbu
atrempare/g po:verbu
atumbare/g po:verbu
atzentrare/g po:verbu
atzoare/g po:verbu
aumentare/g po:verbu
avallare/g po:verbu
avocare/g po:verbu
bantare/g po:verbu
basotare/g po:verbu
bessare/g po:verbu
bistare/g po:verbu
bortare/g po:verbu
brivare/g po:verbu
bufare/g po:verbu
buscare/g po:verbu
cadreddare/g po:verbu
calamitare/g po:verbu
calliare/g po:verbu
camineddare/g po:verbu
cancarronare/g po:verbu
canonizare/g po:verbu
cantzonare/g po:verbu
caraterizare/g po:verbu
cardare/g po:verbu
carminare/g po:verbu
carrare/g po:verbu
carruzare/g po:verbu
cascajare/g po:verbu
castigare/g po:verbu
catrichiddare/g po:verbu
cautelare/g po:verbu
chibare/g po:verbu
chimentare/g po:verbu
chintare/g po:verbu
chischisare/g po:verbu
cobercare/g po:verbu
coghinare/g po:verbu
colembrare/g po:verbu
colorare/g po:verbu
complicare/g po:verbu
congelare/g po:verbu
contare/g po:verbu
controllare/g po:verbu
cordonare/g po:verbu
corriare/g po:verbu
corruscare/g po:verbu
costumare/g po:verbu
crabolare/g po:verbu
cravare/g po:verbu
cresimare/g po:verbu
crobare/g po:verbu
crotzifissare/g po:verbu
cuberrare/g po:verbu
cugumeddare/g po:verbu
cumandare/g po:verbu
cummassare/g po:verbu
cumplotare/g po:verbu
cunditzionare/g po:verbu
cunfinare/g po:verbu
cungelare/g po:verbu
cuntemplare/g po:verbu
cuntzertare/g po:verbu
curiosare/g po:verbu
currumpunare/g po:verbu
dassare/g po:verbu
decollare/g po:verbu
degolliare/g po:verbu
dengare/g po:verbu
derivare/g po:verbu
designare/g po:verbu
destrossare/g po:verbu
devorare/g po:verbu
dilatare/g po:verbu
dinnare/g po:verbu
disafiare/g po:verbu
disaprensionare/g po:verbu
disaurrare/g po:verbu
discriminare/g po:verbu
disdignare/g po:verbu
disfamare/g po:verbu
disimparare/g po:verbu
disintragnare/g po:verbu
disorganizare/g po:verbu
disvelare/g po:verbu
domandare/g po:verbu
dugonare/g po:verbu
emanare/g po:verbu
esecutare/g po:verbu
faghinerare/g po:verbu
farzare/g po:verbu
ferrare/g po:verbu
filtrare/g po:verbu
follietare/g po:verbu
fracare/g po:verbu
frenedigare/g po:verbu
frumbulare/g po:verbu
fundamentare/g po:verbu
fustigare/g po:verbu
geunare/g po:verbu
ghipare/g po:verbu
gioghitare/g po:verbu
graduare/g po:verbu
guastare/g po:verbu
illegerigare/g po:verbu
imballare/g po:verbu
imbolare/g po:verbu
imparare/g po:verbu
impitzare/g po:verbu
imprestare/g po:verbu
incarare/g po:verbu
incravare/g po:verbu
incurpare/g po:verbu
infamare/g po:verbu
ingessare/g po:verbu
innarbonare/g po:verbu
insurdare/g po:verbu
intonare/g po:verbu
intzuddare/g po:verbu
isalenare/g po:verbu
isbarionare/g po:verbu
isborrare/g po:verbu
isbucare/g po:verbu
iscaddare/g po:verbu
iscambitare/g po:verbu
iscantzellare/g po:verbu
iscarpinare/g po:verbu
iscasiddare/g po:verbu
iscaudalare/g po:verbu
ischinchiddare/g po:verbu
iscialare/g po:verbu
isciropare/g po:verbu
iscomputare/g po:verbu
iscordogare/g po:verbu
iscorturare/g po:verbu
iscrachirare/g po:verbu
iscrostare/g po:verbu
isculimerdare/g po:verbu
iscurrelare/g po:verbu
iselembrare/g po:verbu
isfidare/g po:verbu
isforrare/g po:verbu
isfumare/g po:verbu
isgranare/g po:verbu
ismadassare/g po:verbu
isminorigare/g po:verbu
isolrare/g po:verbu
ispantzare/g po:verbu
ispatzare/g po:verbu
ispertare/g po:verbu
ispicare/g po:verbu
ispiridare/g po:verbu
ispompare/g po:verbu
ispreugare/g po:verbu
ispuntinare/g po:verbu
istanare/g po:verbu
istecare/g po:verbu
isterrigare/g po:verbu
istochinare/g po:verbu
istragamullare/g po:verbu
istrichillonare/g po:verbu
istrossare/g po:verbu
istufare/g po:verbu
isurcare/g po:verbu
lagazare/g po:verbu
largare/g po:verbu
licucare/g po:verbu
longare/g po:verbu
lustrare/g po:verbu
mandare/g po:verbu
marietare/g po:verbu
marrutzeddare/g po:verbu
mastutzare/g po:verbu
mentovare/g po:verbu
minchionare/g po:verbu
molietare/g po:verbu
mumusare/g po:verbu
mustrencare/g po:verbu
navighetare/g po:verbu
nudare/g po:verbu
optare/g po:verbu
pabeddare/g po:verbu
parare/g po:verbu
paternostrare/g po:verbu
pensamentare/g po:verbu
pertocare/g po:verbu
pichirinare/g po:verbu
pimpirinare/g po:verbu
pirare/g po:verbu
pistigionare/g po:verbu
polarizare/g po:verbu
pregantare/g po:verbu
pressare/g po:verbu
profetare/g po:verbu
proportzionare/g po:verbu
punnare/g po:verbu
raigare/g po:verbu
raspignare/g po:verbu
rebuddare/g po:verbu
refilare/g po:verbu
regrare/g po:verbu
remoddare/g po:verbu
repicare/g po:verbu
respetare/g po:verbu
retumbare/g po:verbu
ricumpensare/g po:verbu
ringherare/g po:verbu
ritratare/g po:verbu
ruinare/g po:verbu
sacramentare/g po:verbu
sangrenare/g po:verbu
sedare/g po:verbu
senare/g po:verbu
serritare/g po:verbu
simingionare/g po:verbu
sollare/g po:verbu
suare/g po:verbu
suerare/g po:verbu
summare/g po:verbu
surfatare/g po:verbu
sutrinnare/g po:verbu
tamponare/g po:verbu
teitare/g po:verbu
tintinnare/g po:verbu
tosconare/g po:verbu
tragangiare/g po:verbu
tramputzare/g po:verbu
traspirare/g po:verbu
tregeare/g po:verbu
trivellare/g po:verbu
trubare/g po:verbu
tulare/g po:verbu
tzacarrare/g po:verbu
tzanchitare/g po:verbu
tzasconare/g po:verbu
tzilibecare/g po:verbu
tzirolitare/g po:verbu
tzopitare/g po:verbu
tzutzinare/g po:verbu
uniformare/g po:verbu
valutare/g po:verbu
visionare/g po:verbu
